Utah statutes.
63M-9-102.   Purpose of chapter.
(1)  It is declared that the policy of the state is to unite the Department of
Human Services, the State Office of Education, the Department of Health, the
Office of the Court Administrator, and the Department of Workforce Services,
community-based service organizations, and parents to develop and implement
comprehensive systems of services and supports for children and youth at risk
and their families.
(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that service delivery systems
developed under this chapter shall require collaboration between existing
state and local agencies and between public, private, and voluntary agencies
to enhance their capacity to meet community needs.
